Missouri, session 2026, HB2698.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 313.660, RSMo, is repealed, to read as follows:
[313.660. 1. No individual shall for a fee, directly or indirectly, accept
anything of value to be wagered or to be transmitted or delivered for wager in
any pari-mutuel system of wagering on horse racing or for a fee deliver
anything of value which has been received outside of the enclosure of a race
track holding a horse race licensed under sections 313.500 to 313.710 to be
placed as wagers in the pari-mutuel pool within such enclosure.
2. Any individual violating the provisions of this section shall upon
conviction be guilty of a class D felony.]
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.